New York, session 2025-2026, S7236.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 400.03 of the penal law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 9 to read as follows: 3 9. Any ammunition background check required under this section shall 4 be denied if it is determined that the ammunition purchaser is prohibit- 5 ed from possessing a shotgun or rifle pursuant to this chapter, 6 subsection (g) of section 922 of Title 18 of the United States Code, or 7 a temporary or final extreme risk protection order issued under article 8 sixty-three-A of the civil practice law and rules. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11499-01-5